Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 36-97.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context or subject matter requires otherwise, the following words or terms shall have the meaning herein ascribed to them, respectively:

“Board”
means the Board of Housing and Community Development.

“Review Board”
means the State Building Code Technical Review Board.

“Building Code”
means the Uniform Statewide Building Code and building regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant thereto.

“Code provisions”
means the provisions of the Uniform Statewide Building Code as adopted and promulgated by the Board, and the amendments thereof as adopted and promulgated by such Board from time to time.

“Building regulations”
means any law, rule, resolution, regulation, ordinance or code, general or special, or compilation thereof, heretofore or hereafter enacted or adopted by the Commonwealth or any county or municipality, including departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, or other agencies thereof, relating to construction, reconstruction, alteration, conversion, repair, maintenance, or use of structures and buildings and installation of equipment therein. The term does not include zoning ordinances or other land use controls that do not affect the manner of construction or materials to be used in the erection, alteration or repair of a building or structure.

“Municipality”
means any city or town in this Commonwealth.

“Local governing body”
means the governing body of any city, county or town in this Commonwealth.

“Local building department”
means the agency or agencies of any local governing body charged with the administration, supervision, or enforcement of the Building Code and regulations, approval of plans, inspection of buildings, or issuance of permits, licenses, certificates or similar documents.

“State agency”
means any state department, board, bureau, commission, or agency of this Commonwealth.

“Building”
means a combination of any materials, whether portable or fixed, having a roof to form a structure for the use or occupancy by persons, or property. The word “building” shall be construed as though followed by the words “or part or parts thereof” unless the context clearly requires a different meaning. “Building” shall not include roadway tunnels and bridges owned by the Department of Transportation, which shall be governed by construction and design standards approved by the Commonwealth Transportation Board.

“Equipment”
means plumbing, heating, electrical, ventilating, air-conditioning and refrigeration equipment, elevators, dumbwaiters, escalators, and other mechanical additions or installations.

“Farm building or structure”
means a building or structure not used for residential purposes, located on property where farming operations take place, and used primarily for any of the following uses or combination thereof:

Storage, handling, production, display, sampling or sale of agricultural, horticultural, floricultural or silvicultural products produced in the farm;

Sheltering, raising, handling, processing or sale of agricultural animals or agricultural animal products;

Business or office uses relating to the farm operations;

Use of farm machinery or equipment or maintenance or storage of vehicles, machinery or equipment on the farm;

Storage or use of supplies and materials used on the farm; or

Implementation of best management practices associated with farm operations.“Construction” means the construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair or conversion of buildings and structures.“Owner” means the owner or owners of the freehold of the premises or lesser estate therein, a mortgagee or vendee in possession, assignee of rents, receiver, executor, trustee, or lessee in control of a building or structure.“Director” means the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development.“Structure” means an assembly of materials forming a construction for occupancy or use including stadiums, gospel and circus tents, reviewing stands, platforms, stagings, observation towers, radio towers, water tanks, storage tanks (underground and aboveground), trestles, piers, wharves, swimming pools, amusement devices, storage bins, and other structures of this general nature but excluding water wells. The word “structure” shall be construed as though followed by the words “or part or parts thereof” unless the context clearly requires a different meaning. “Structure” shall not include roadway tunnels and bridges owned by the Department of Transportation, which shall be governed by construction and design standards approved by the Commonwealth Transportation Board.“Department” means the Department of Housing and Community Development.

History.

1972, c. 829; 1974, cc. 622, 668; 1975, c. 394; 1977, cc. 423, 613; 1978, c. 703; 1986, c. 401; 1993, c. 662; 1994, c. 256; 1998, c. 755; 2005, c. 341.

The numbers of §§

36-97

through

36-119

were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1972 act having assigned no numbers.

Cross references.

As to the requirements of this chapter applying to the siting of biotechnology research activities, see §

2.2-5509

.

As to the security of certain records submitted for the purpose of complying with the Uniform Statewide Building Code, §

36-97

et seq., or the Statewide Fire Prevention Code, §

27-94

et seq., see §

36-105.3

.

As to compliance by licensed assisted living facilities, adult day care centers and child welfare agencies with the Virginia Uniform Statewide Building Code, see §

63.2-1705

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1998, c. 755, cl. 2, which had provided:
“That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall expire on July 1, 2000,” was repealed by Acts 2000, c. 751, cl. 2.

Acts 2002, c. 317, provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Conservation and Recreation is hereby authorized to build an interpretive 1775 fort at Wilderness Road State Park utilizing the construction techniques of that period.

“§ 2. That in the interest of accurately representing that historic period, the structure shall be exempt from the Uniform Statewide Building Code as set forth in §

36-97

et seq., and any other local building codes or ordinances.

“§ 3. That the Department of Conservation and Recreation is authorized to enter into a lease contract with any entity, public or private, that it deems qualified, for the construction and operation of the facility. The Department may enter into this lease upon terms and conditions the Department deems proper and with the approval of the Governor and the Attorney General.”

Acts 2004, c. 138, effective March 15, 2004, in cl. 1 provides:

“

§ 1. The use of natural cut Christmas trees in places of worship and in apartment dwelling units.

“The Board of Housing and Community Development shall promulgate regulations in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) to permit the use of natural cut Christmas trees in places of worship and apartment dwelling units without an approved automatic sprinkler system. In the development of the regulations, the Board of Housing and Community Development shall seek input from state and local fire code officials, local building code officials, representatives of apartment owners and managers, and representatives of places of worship.”

Acts 2005, c. 442, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. The use of natural cut Christmas trees in places of worship and in apartment dwelling units.

“Emergency regulations adopted by the Board of Housing and Community Development following the enactment of Chapter 138 of the Acts of Assembly of 2004 shall remain in full force and effect until a regulation to replace the emergency regulations is adopted in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia or July 2006, whichever occurs first.”

Acts 2019, c. 723 provides: “§ 1. That the Department of Housing and Community Development is directed to convene stakeholders representing entities that enforce the Uniform Statewide Building Code (USBC) (§

36-97

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) and the Statewide Fire Prevention Code (SFPC) (§

27-94

et seq. of the Code of Virginia) and other law-enforcement organizations to develop proposals for changes to the USBC and SFPC for submission to the Board of Housing and Community Development. Such proposals shall have the goal of assisting in the provision of safety and security measures for the Commonwealth’s public or private elementary and secondary schools and public or private institutions of higher education for active shooter or hostile threats. The review of the stakeholders shall include the examination of (i) locking devices, (ii) barricade devices, and (iii) other safety measures that may be utilized in an active shooter or hostile threat situation that occurs in any classroom or other area where students are located for a finite period of time.”

The 1998 amendment,

in the paragraph defining “Building,” deleted “however, farm buildings not used for residential purposes and frequented generally by the owner, members of his family, and farm employees shall be exempt from the provisions of the Uniform Statewide Building Code, but such buildings lying within a flood plain or in a mudslide-prone area shall be subject to flood proofing regulations or mudslide regulations, as applicable” following “occupancy by persons, or property,” added the paragraph defining “Farm building or structure,” and in the paragraph defining “Structure,” deleted the former second sentence, which read: “Farm structures not used for residential purposes shall be exempt from the provisions of the Uniform Statewide Building Code, but such structures lying within a flood plain or in a mudslide-prone area shall be subject to flood proofing regulations or mudslide regulations, as applicable.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 341 added the last sentence in the definitions of “Building” and “Structure.”

Law Review.

For comment on local liability for negligent inspection of buildings and equipment, see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 809 (1984).

For article, “Antitrust and Trade Regulation,” see 35 U. Rich. L. Rev. 453 (2001).

For article surveying developments in real estate and land use law in Virginia from June 1, 2001 through June 1, 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 271 (2002).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Land Use and Zoning Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 223 (2012).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-212 Inspection upon Tenant’s Occupation of Premises, et seq.; No. 16-226 Covenants by Tenant Regarding Maintenance of the Premises; No. 16-230 Use of Premises; No. 13-313 Contract to Build a House, et seq. No. 16-320 Checklist for Drafting Residential Lease, et seq.; No. 16-432 Disclosures and Notices Under Virginia Residential Property Disclosure Act.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elevators, § 2; 9A M.J. Health and Sanitation, § 5; 13B M.J. Negligence, § 15; 17 M.J. State, § 10.

§ 36-98.
Board to promulgate Statewide Code; other codes and regulations superseded; exceptions.

The Board is hereby directed and empowered to adopt and promulgate a Uniform Statewide Building Code. Such building code shall supersede the building codes and regulations of the counties, municipalities and other political subdivisions and state agencies.

However, such Code shall not supersede the regulations of other state agencies which require and govern the functional design and operation of building related activities not covered by the Uniform Statewide Building Code including but not limited to (i) public water supply systems, (ii) waste water treatment and disposal systems, and (iii) solid waste facilities. Nor shall state agencies be prevented from requiring, pursuant to other state law, that buildings and equipment be maintained in accordance with provisions of the Uniform Statewide Building Code.

Such Code also shall supersede the provisions of local ordinances applicable to single-family residential construction that (a) regulate dwelling foundations or crawl spaces, (b) require the use of specific building materials or finishes in construction, or (c) require minimum surface area or numbers of windows; however, such Code shall not supersede proffered conditions accepted as a part of a rezoning application, conditions imposed upon the grant of special exceptions, special or conditional use permits or variances, conditions imposed upon a clustering of single-family homes and preservation of open space development through standards, conditions, and criteria established by a locality pursuant to subdivision 8 of §

15.2-2242

or §

15.2-2286.1

, or land use requirements in airport or highway overlay districts, or historic districts created pursuant to §

15.2-2306

, or local flood plain regulations adopted as a condition of participation in the National Flood Insurance Program.

History.

1972, c. 829; 1977, c. 613; 1979, c. 718; 1980, c. 104; 1982, c. 267; 2001, c. 525; 2002, c. 703; 2006, c. 903.

Cross references.

As to the transfer of powers and duties of the Office of Housing to the Department of Housing and Community Development, see editor’s note to §

36-131

.

For provisions empowering the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development to administer the Uniform Statewide Building Code, see §

36-139

12.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, c. 903, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2002, c. 703, cl. 2, effective July 1, 2007, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect any final site plan or subdivision plat approved pursuant to existing law by a locality prior to the adoption by that locality of provisions enacted pursuant to subdivision A 12 of §

15.2-2286

of this act but not later than July 1, 2004.”

Acts 2017, c. 731, cl. 1, effective March 24, 2017, provides: “That the Department of Housing and Community Development shall consider including in the current revision of the Uniform Statewide Building Code a provision designed to ensure that localities provide appropriate notice to residents of manufactured home parks of any Building Code violation by a park owner that jeopardizes the health and safety of those residents and shall report to the General Assembly regarding the status of such efforts no later than November 1, 2017.”

Acts 2020, cc. 130 and 533, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Housing and Community Development is directed to convene stakeholders representing entities that enforce the Uniform Statewide Building Code (USBC)(§

36-97

et seq.) and the Statewide Fire Prevention Code (SFPC)(§

27-94

et seq.), other law-enforcement organizations, and representatives of local governments throughout the Commonwealth of Virginia to develop proposals for changes to the USBC and SFPC for submission to the Board of Housing and Community Development. Such proposals shall have the goal of assisting in the provision of safety and security measures for the Commonwealth’s public buildings for active shooter or hostile threats while maintaining compliance with basic accessibility requirements under the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. § 12131 et seq.). The review of the stakeholders shall include the examination of (i) door locking devices, (ii) barricade devices, and (iii) other safety measures on doors and windows for the purpose of preventing both ingress and egress in the event of a threat to the physical security of persons in such buildings.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 525, in the second paragraph, changed the designators (1), (2) and (3) to (i), (ii) and (iii), and added the third paragraph.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 703, in the final paragraph, substituted “single-family” for “single family” in the introductory language, and inserted “conditions imposed upon a clustering of single-family homes and preservation of open space development through standards, conditions, and criteria established by a locality pursuant to subdivision 8 of §

15.2-2242

or subdivision A 12 of §

15.2-2286

” in clause (c).

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 903, effective July 1, 2007, substituted “§

15.2-2286

.1” for “subdivision A 12 of §

15.2-2286

” in the last paragraph.

Law Review.

For comment on local liability for negligent inspection of buildings and equipment, see 18 U. Rich. L. Rev. 809 (1984).

§ 36-98.01.
Mechanics’ lien agent included on building permit for residential property at request of applicant.

In addition to any information required by the Uniform Statewide Building Code, a building permit issued for any one- or two-family residential dwelling unit shall at the time of issuance contain, at the request of the applicant, the name, mailing address, and telephone number of the mechanics’ lien agent as defined in §

43-1

. If the designation of a mechanics’ lien agent is not so requested by the applicant, the building permit shall at the time of issuance state that none has been designated with the words “None Designated.”

History.

1992, cc. 779, 787.

§ 36-98.1.
State buildings; exception for certain assets owned by the Department of Transportation.

The Building Code shall be applicable to all state-owned buildings and structures, and to all buildings and structures built on state-owned property, with the exception that §§

2.2-1159

through

2.2-1161

shall provide the standards for ready access to and use of state-owned buildings by the physically handicapped.Any state-owned building or structure, or building or structure built on state-owned property, for which preliminary plans were prepared or on which construction commenced after the initial effective date of the Uniform Statewide Building Code, shall remain subject to the provisions of the Uniform Statewide Building Code that were in effect at the time such plans were completed or such construction commenced. Subsequent reconstruction, renovation or demolition of such building or structure shall be subject to the pertinent provisions of the Building Code.Acting through the Division of Engineering and Buildings, the Department of General Services shall function as the building official for any state-owned buildings or structures and for all buildings and structures built on state-owned property. The Department shall review and approve plans and specifications, grant modifications, and establish such rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement this section. It may provide for the (i) inspection of state-owned buildings or structures and for all buildings and structures built on state-owned property and (ii) enforcement of the Building Code and standards for access by the physically handicapped by delegating inspection and Building Code enforcement duties to the State Fire Marshal’s Office, to other appropriate state agencies having needed expertise, and to local building departments, all of which shall provide such assistance within a reasonable time and in the manner requested. State agencies and institutions occupying buildings shall pay to the local building department the same fees as would be paid by a private citizen for the services rendered when such services are requested by the Department of General Services. The Department of General Services may alter or overrule any decision of the local building department after having first considered the local building department’s report or other rationale given for its decision. When altering or overruling any decision of a local building department, the Department of General Services shall provide the local building department with a written summary of its reasons for doing so.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A and §

27-99

, roadway tunnels and bridges owned by the Department of Transportation shall be exempt from the Building Code and the Statewide Fire Prevention Code Act (§

27-94

et seq.). The Department of General Services shall not have jurisdiction over such roadway tunnels, bridges, and other limited access highways; provided, however, that the Department of General Services shall have jurisdiction over any occupied buildings within any Department of Transportation rights-of-way that are subject to the Building Code.Roadway tunnels and bridges shall be designed, constructed, and operated to comply with fire safety standards based on nationally recognized model codes and standards to be developed by the Department of Transportation in consultation with the State Fire Marshal. Emergency response planning and activities related to the standards shall be developed by the Department of Transportation and coordinated with the appropriate local officials and emergency services providers. On an annual basis the Department of Transportation shall provide a report on the maintenance and operability of installed fire protection and detection systems in roadway tunnels and bridges to the State Fire Marshal.

Except as provided in subsection E of §

23.1-1016

, and notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, at the request of a public institution of higher education, the Department, as further set forth in this subsection, shall authorize that institution of higher education to contract with a building official of the locality in which the construction is taking place to perform any inspection and certifications required for the purpose of complying with the Uniform Statewide Building Code (§

36-97

et seq.). The Department shall publish administrative procedures that shall be followed in contracting with a building official of the locality. The authority granted to a public institution of higher education under this subsection to contract with a building official of the locality shall be subject to the institution meeting the conditions prescribed in subsection A of §

23.1-1002

.

This section shall not apply to the nonhabitable structures, equipment, and wiring owned by a public service company, a certificated provider of telecommunications services, or a franchised cable operator that are built on rights-of-way owned or controlled by the Commonwealth Transportation Board.

History.

1981, c. 325; 1982, c. 97; 1986, c. 133; 2005, cc. 341, 933, 945; 2010, c. 105; 2013, cc. 585, 646.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, cc. 585 and 646, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not be construed to invalidate any action taken or approval rendered by the Commonwealth Transportation Board prior to July 1, 2013, and that any and all actions taken and all approvals rendered by the Board prior to July 1, 2013, shall remain valid and in effect unless modified, superseded, or repealed by subsequent action of the Board.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “subsection E of §

23.1-1016

” was substituted for “subsection D of § 23-38.109” and “subsection A of §

23.1-1002

” was substituted for “subsection B of § 23-38.88” in subsection C to conform to the recodification of Title 23 by Acts 2016, c. 588, effective October 1, 2016.

Acts 2020, cc. 130 and 533, cl. 1 provides: “That the Department of Housing and Community Development is directed to convene stakeholders representing entities that enforce the Uniform Statewide Building Code (USBC)(§

36-97

et seq.) and the Statewide Fire Prevention Code (SFPC)(§

27-94

et seq.), other law-enforcement organizations, and representatives of local governments throughout the Commonwealth of Virginia to develop proposals for changes to the USBC and SFPC for submission to the Board of Housing and Community Development. Such proposals shall have the goal of assisting in the provision of safety and security measures for the Commonwealth’s public buildings for active shooter or hostile threats while maintaining compliance with basic accessibility requirements under the Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. § 12131 et seq.). The review of the stakeholders shall include the examination of (i) door locking devices, (ii) barricade devices, and (iii) other safety measures on doors and windows for the purpose of preventing both ingress and egress in the event of a threat to the physical security of persons in such buildings.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 341 inserted the subsection A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and added subsection B.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 933 and 945 are identical, and inserted the subsection A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and added subsection C.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 105, in subsection A, inserted “and to all buildings and structures built on state-owned property” in the first paragraph, inserted “or building or structure built on state-owned property” in the first sentence of the second paragraph, and in the third paragraph, inserted “any” and “or structures and for all buildings and structures built on state-owned property” in the first sentence, substituted “may” for “shall,” inserted the clause designators, and inserted “or structures and for all buildings and structures built on state-owned property” in the third sentence; added subsection D; and made related punctuation changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 585 and 646 are identical, and in subsection B, in the second paragraph, deleted “and approved by the Commonwealth Transportation Board” following “Fire Marshal,” and “approved by the Commonwealth Transportation Board” preceding “shall be developed.”

§ 36-98.2.
Appeals from decision of Building Official regarding state-owned buildings.

Appeals by the involved state agency from the decision of the Building Official for state-owned buildings shall be made directly to the State Building Code Technical Review Board.

History.

1982, c. 97.

§ 36-98.3.
Amusement devices.

The Board shall have the power and duty to promulgate regulations pertaining to the construction, maintenance, operation and inspection of amusement devices. “Amusement device” means (i) a device or structure open to the public by which persons are conveyed or moved in an unusual manner for diversion, but excluding snow tubing parks and rides, ski terrain parks, ski slopes and ski trails, and (ii) passenger tramways. A “passenger tramway” means a device used to transport passengers uphill, and suspended in the air by the use of steel cables, chains or belts, or by ropes, and usually supported by trestles or towers with one or more spans. Regulations promulgated hereunder shall include provisions for the following:

The issuance of certificates of inspection prior to the operation of an amusement device;

The demonstration of financial responsibility of the owner or operator of the amusement device prior to the operation of an amusement device;

Maintenance inspections of existing amusement devices;

Reporting of accidents resulting in serious injury or death;

Immediate investigative inspections following accidents involving an amusement device that result in serious injury or death;

Certification of amusement device inspectors;

Qualifications of amusement device operators;

Notification by amusement device owners or operators of an intent to operate at a location within the Commonwealth; and

A timely reconsideration of the decision of the local building department when an amusement device owner or operator is aggrieved by such a decision.

In promulgating regulations, the Board shall have due regard for generally accepted standards as recommended by nationally recognized organizations. Where appropriate, the Board shall establish separate standards for mobile amusement devices and for amusement devices permanently affixed to a site.

To assist the Board in the administration of this section, the Board shall appoint an Amusement Device Technical Advisory Committee, which shall be composed of five members who, by virtue of their education, training or employment, have demonstrated adequate knowledge of amusement devices or the amusement industry. The Board shall determine the terms of the Amusement Device Technical Advisory Committee members. The Amusement Device Technical Advisory Committee shall recommend standards for the construction, maintenance, operation and inspection of amusement devices, including the qualifications of amusement device operators and the certification of inspectors, and otherwise perform advisory functions as the Board may require.

Inspections required by this section shall be performed by persons certified by the Board pursuant to subdivision 6 of §

36-137

as competent to inspect amusement devices. The provisions of §

36-105

notwithstanding, the local governing body shall enforce the regulations promulgated by the Board for existing amusement devices. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the local governing body from authorizing inspections to be performed by persons who are not employees of the local governing body, provided those inspectors are certified by the Board as provided herein. The Board is authorized to conduct or cause to be conducted any inspection required by this section, provided that the person performing the inspection on behalf of the Board is certified by the Board as provided herein.

To the extent they are not superseded by the provisions of this section and the regulations promulgated hereunder, the provisions of this chapter and the Uniform Statewide Building Code shall apply to amusement devices.

History.

1986, c. 427; 1991, c. 152; 2011, c. 546.

Cross references.

As to the Amusement Device Rider Safety Act, see § 59.1-519 et seq.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 546 inserted “but excluding snow tubing parks and rides, ski terrain parks, ski slopes and ski trails” in the second sentence in subsection A.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Labor and Employment Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 513 (2009).

§ 36-98.4.
Agritourism event buildings.

The Board shall appoint an Agritourism Event Structure Technical Advisory Committee, consisting of nine members. The nine members shall be appointed one each from the following: Virginia Farm Bureau Federation, the Virginia Agribusiness Council, the Virginia Wineries Association, the Virginia Craft Brewers Guild, a craft beverage manufacturer, the Virginia Association of Counties, the Virginia Fire Prevention Association, the Virginia Fire Services Board, and the Virginia Building and Code Officials Association.

History.

2022, c. 262.

Editor's note.

Acts 2022, c. 262, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of subsections A and C of §

36-98.4

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall not become effective unless reenacted by the 2023 Session of the General Assembly.”

§ 36-99.
Provisions of Code; modifications.

The Building Code shall prescribe building regulations to be complied with in the construction and rehabilitation of buildings and structures, and the equipment therein as defined in §

36-97

, and shall prescribe regulations to ensure that such buildings and structures are properly maintained, and shall also prescribe procedures for the administration and enforcement of such regulations, including procedures to be used by the local building department in the evaluation and granting of modifications for any provision of the Building Code, provided the spirit and functional intent of the Building Code are observed and public health, welfare and safety are assured. The provisions of the Building Code and modifications thereof shall be such as to protect the health, safety and welfare of the residents of the Commonwealth, provided that buildings and structures should be permitted to be constructed, rehabilitated and maintained at the least possible cost consistent with recognized standards of health, safety, energy conservation and water conservation, including provisions necessary to prevent overcrowding, rodent or insect infestation, and garbage accumulation; and barrier-free provisions for the physically handicapped and aged. Such regulations shall be reasonable and appropriate to the objectives of this chapter.

In formulating the Code provisions, the Board shall have due regard for generally accepted standards as recommended by nationally recognized organizations, including, but not limited to, the standards of the International Code Council and the National Fire Protection Association. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, farm buildings and structures shall be exempt from the provisions of the Building Code, except for a building or a portion of a building located on a farm that is operated as a restaurant as defined in §

35.1-1

and licensed as such by the Board of Health pursuant to Chapter 2 (§

35.1-11

et seq.) of Title 35.1. However, farm buildings and structures lying within a flood plain or in a mudslide-prone area shall be subject to flood-proofing regulations or mudslide regulations, as applicable.

Where practical, the Code provisions shall be stated in terms of required level of performance, so as to facilitate the prompt acceptance of new building materials and methods. When generally recognized standards of performance are not available, such provisions shall provide for acceptance of materials and methods whose performance has been found by the local building department, on the basis of reliable test and evaluation data, presented by the proponent, to be substantially equal in safety to those specified.

The Board, upon a finding that sufficient allegations exist regarding failures noted in several localities of performance standards by either building materials, methods, or design, may conduct hearings on such allegations if it determines that such alleged failures, if proven, would have an adverse impact on the health, safety, or welfare of the citizens of the Commonwealth. After at least 21 days’ written notice, the Board shall convene a hearing to consider such allegations. Such notice shall be given to the known manufacturers of the subject building material and as many other interested parties, industry representatives, and trade groups as can reasonably be identified. Following the hearing, the Board, upon finding that (i) the current technical or administrative Code provisions allow use of or result in defective or deficient building materials, methods, or designs, and (ii) immediate action is necessary to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of the Commonwealth, may issue amended regulations establishing interim performance standards and Code provisions for the installation, application, and use of such building materials, methods or designs in the Commonwealth. Such amended regulations shall become effective upon their publication in the Virginia Register of Regulations. Any amendments to regulations adopted pursuant to this subsection shall become effective upon their publication in the Virginia Register of Regulations and shall be effective for a period of 24 months or until adopted, modified, or repealed by the Board.

History.

1972, c. 829; 1974, c. 433; 1975, c. 394; 1977, cc. 423, 613; 1978, c. 581; 1981, c. 2; 1982, c. 267; 1998, c. 755; 2000, c. 751; 2002, c. 555; 2003, cc. 436, 650, 901.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1998, c. 755, cl. 2, which had provided:
“That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall expire on July 1, 2000,” was repealed by Acts 2000, c. 751, cl. 2.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 425, cl. 1 provides:

“§ 1. That upon each publication by the International Code Council of a new version of the International Energy Conservation Code (IECC), the Board of Housing and Community Development (the Board) shall consider adopting amendments to the Uniform Statewide Building Code (Building Code) to address changes in the IECC relating to energy efficiency and conservation. In doing so, the Board shall consider adopting Building Code standards that are at least as stringent as those contained in the new version of the IECC. For the purposes of this act, a standard shall be deemed to be as stringent as one contained in the IECC if such standard would perform the same function as that contained in the IECC without using more energy than would be used under the IECC standard. In conducting its review, the Board shall assess the public health, safety, and welfare benefits of adopting standards that are at least as stringent as those contained in the IECC, including potential energy savings and air quality benefits over time compared to the cost of initial construction.”

The 1998 amendment,

in subsection B, added the second and third sentences.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 751 inserted the language beginning “except for a building” and ending “of Title 35.1” in the next-to-last sentence of subsection B.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 555, in subsection A, in the first sentence, inserted “and maintenance” following “construction” and substituted “ensure” for “insure,” and substituted “the” for “this” preceding “Commonwealth” in the second sentence; and substituted “International Code Council” for “Southern Building Code Congress, the Building Officials Conference of America” in the first sentence of subsection B.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 436 added subsection D.

The 2003 amendment by c. 650 in subsection A, substituted “rehabilitation” for “maintenance” following “construction and,” substituted “buildings and structures” for “regulations” following “that such,” substituted “including procedures to be used by the local building department in the evaluation and granting of modifications for any provision of the Building Code provided the spirit and functional intent of the Building Code are observed and public health, welfare and safety are assured. The provisions of the Building Code and modifications” for “The provisions” following “such regulations,” and inserted “and rehabilitated” following “to be constructed;” and substituted “local building department” for “Board” in subsection C.

The 2003 amendment by c. 901, in subsection A, in the second sentence, inserted “and maintained” preceding “at the least,” and substituted “including provisions necessary to prevent overcrowding, rodent or insect infestation, and garbage accumulation; and” for “and.”

Law Review.

For article reviewing case law and changes in legislation affecting Virginia construction law, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 143 (2005).

For Essay, see “The Grapes of Wrath: Encouraging Fruitful Collaborations Between Local Governments and Farm Wineries in the Commonwealth,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 235 (2013).